Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-169
Banks; reports; published statements; failure to make; penalty, recovery.

Any bank that shall fail, neglect, or refuse to make or furnish any report or any published statement required by the Nebraska Banking Act shall pay to the department fifty dollars for each day such failure shall continue, unless the department shall extend the time for filing such report.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 20, p. 76;

R.S.1913, § 299;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 20, p. 693;

C.S.1922, § 8001;

C.S.1929, § 8-132;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 22, p. 146;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-132;

R.S.1943, § 8-134;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-134;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 59, p. 162;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 18;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 14.

This section is referred to as providing penalty in contrasting this section with another section of the banking act which failed to provide a penalty, and holding that the failure to provide a penalty disclosed legislative intent that statute should be directory rather than mandatory. State ex rel. Davis v. Farmers State Bank of Winside, 112 Neb. 597, 200 N.W. 173 (1924).